Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5937.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 59.18.030 and 2023 c 331 s 2 and 2023 c 277 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:As used in this chapter:(1) "Active duty" means service authorized by the president of the United States, the secretary of defense, or the governor for a period of more than 30 consecutive days.(2) "Authentication data" means the data generated or collected at the point of authentication in connection with granting a user entry to a smart access building, common area, or dwelling unit through such building's smart access system, excluding data generated through or collected by a video, audio, or camera system that is used to monitor entrances but not grant entry.(3) "Biometric identifier information" means a physiological, biological, or behavioral characteristic that is used to identify, or assist in identifying, an individual including, but not limited to:(a) A retina or iris scan;(b) A fingerprint;(c) A voiceprint; or(d) A scan or record of a palm, hand, or face geometry.(4) "Certificate of inspection" means an unsworn statement, declaration, verification, or certificate made in accordance with the requirements of chapter 5.50 RCW by a qualified inspector that states that the landlord has not failed to fulfill any substantial obligation imposed under RCW 59.18.060 that endangers or impairs the health or safety of a tenant, including (a) structural members that are of insufficient size or strength to carry imposed loads with safety, (b) exposure of the occupants to the weather, (c) plumbing and sanitation defects that directly expose the occupants to the risk of illness or injury, (d) not providing facilities adequate to supply heat and water and hot water as reasonably required by the tenant, (e) providing heating or ventilation systems that are not functional or are hazardous, (f) defective, hazardous, or missing electrical wiring or electrical service, (g) defective or hazardous exits that increase the risk of injury to occupants, and (h) conditions that increase the risk of fire.(((3)))(5) "Commercially reasonable manner," with respect to a sale of a deceased tenant's personal property, means a sale where every aspect of the sale, including the method, manner, time, place, and other terms, must be commercially reasonable. If commercially reasonable, a landlord may sell the tenant's property by public or private proceedings, by one or more contracts, as a unit or in parcels, and at any time and place and on any terms.(((4)))(6) "Comprehensive reusable tenant screening report" means a tenant screening report prepared by a consumer reporting agency at the direction of and paid for by the prospective tenant and made available directly to a prospective landlord at no charge, which contains all of the following: (a) A consumer credit report prepared by a consumer reporting agency within the past 30 days; (b) the prospective tenant's criminal history; (c) the prospective tenant's eviction history; (d) an employment verification; and (e) the prospective tenant's address and rental history.(((5)))(7) "Criminal history" means a report containing or summarizing (a) the prospective tenant's criminal convictions and pending cases, the final disposition of which antedates the report by no more than seven years, and (b) the results of a sex offender registry and United States department of the treasury's office of foreign assets control search, all based on at least seven years of address history and alias information provided by the prospective tenant or available in the consumer credit report.(((6)))(8) "Designated person" means a person designated by the tenant under RCW 59.18.590.(((7)))(9) "Distressed home" has the same meaning as in RCW 61.34.020.(((8)))(10) "Distressed home conveyance" has the same meaning as in RCW 61.34.020.(((9)))(11) "Distressed home purchaser" has the same meaning as in RCW 61.34.020.(((10)))(12) "Dwelling unit" is a structure or that part of a structure which is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one person or by two or more persons maintaining a common household, including but not limited to single-family residences and units of multiplexes, apartment buildings, and mobile homes.(((11)))(13) "Eviction history" means a report containing or summarizing the contents of any records of unlawful detainer actions concerning the prospective tenant that are reportable in accordance with state law, are lawful for landlords to consider, and are obtained after a search based on at least seven years of address history and alias information provided by the prospective tenant or available in the consumer credit report.(((12)))(14) "Gang" means a group that: (a) Consists of three or more persons; (b) has identifiable leadership or an identifiable name, sign, or symbol; and (c) on an ongoing basis, regularly conspires and acts in concert mainly for criminal purposes.(((13)))(15) "Gang-related activity" means any activity that occurs within the gang or advances a gang purpose.(((14)))(16) "Immediate family" includes state registered domestic partner, spouse, parents, grandparents, children, including foster children, siblings, and in-laws.(((15)))(17) "In danger of foreclosure" means any of the following:(a) The homeowner has defaulted on the mortgage and, under the terms of the mortgage, the mortgagee has the right to accelerate full payment of the mortgage and repossess, sell, or cause to be sold the property;(b) The homeowner is at least 30 days delinquent on any loan that is secured by the property; or(c) The homeowner has a good faith belief that he or she is likely to default on the mortgage within the upcoming four months due to a lack of funds, and the homeowner has reported this belief to:(i) The mortgagee;(ii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 19.134 RCW;(iii) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 19.146 RCW;(iv) A person licensed or required to be licensed under chapter 18.85 RCW;(v) An attorney-at-law;(vi) A mortgage counselor or other credit counselor licensed or certified by any federal, state, or local agency; or(vii) Any other party to a distressed property conveyance.(((16)))(18) "Landlord" means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of the dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, and in addition means any person designated as representative of the owner, lessor, or sublessor including, but not limited to, an agent, a resident manager, or a designated property manager.(((17)))(19) "Mortgage" is used in the general sense and includes all instruments, including deeds of trust, that are used to secure an obligation by an interest in real property.(((18)))(20) "Orders" means written official military orders, or any written notification, certification, or verification from the service member's commanding officer, with respect to the service member's current or future military status.(((19)))(21) "Owner" means one or more persons, jointly or severally, in whom is vested:(a) All or any part of the legal title to property; or(b) All or part of the beneficial ownership, and a right to present use and enjoyment of the property.(((20)))(22) "Permanent change of station" means: (a) Transfer to a unit located at another port or duty station; (b) change in a unit's home port or permanent duty station; (c) call to active duty for a period not less than 90 days; (d) separation; or (e) retirement.(((21)))(23) "Person" means an individual, group of individuals, corporation, government, or governmental agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, or association, two or more persons having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity.(((22)))(24) "Premises" means a dwelling unit, appurtenances thereto, grounds, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally and any other area or facility which is held out for use by the tenant.(((23)))(25) "Property" or "rental property" means all dwelling units on a contiguous quantity of land managed by the same landlord as a single, rental complex.(((24)))(26) "Prospective landlord" means a landlord or a person who advertises, solicits, offers, or otherwise holds a dwelling unit out as available for rent.(((25)))(27) "Prospective tenant" means a tenant or a person who has applied for residential housing that is governed under this chapter.(((26)))(28) "Qualified inspector" means a United States department of housing and urban development certified inspector; a Washington state licensed home inspector; an American society of home inspectors certified inspector; a private inspector certified by the national association of housing and redevelopment officials, the American association of code enforcement, or other comparable professional association as approved by the local municipality; a municipal code enforcement officer; a Washington licensed structural engineer; or a Washington licensed architect.(((27)))(29) "Reasonable attorneys' fees," where authorized in this chapter, means an amount to be determined including the following factors: The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of the questions involved, the skill requisite to perform the legal service properly, the fee customarily charged in the locality for similar legal services, the amount involved and the results obtained, and the experience, reputation and ability of the lawyer or lawyers performing the services.(((28)))(30) "Reasonable manner," with respect to disposing of a deceased tenant's personal property, means to dispose of the property by donation to a not-for-profit charitable organization, by removal of the property by a trash hauler or recycler, or by any other method that is reasonable under the circumstances.(((29)))(31) "Reference data" means the information against which authentication data is verified at the point of authentication by a smart access system in order to grant a user entry to a smart access building, a dwelling unit of a smart access building, or a common area of a smart access building.(32) "Rent" or "rental amount" means recurring and periodic charges identified in the rental agreement for the use and occupancy of the premises, which may include charges for utilities. Except as provided in RCW 59.18.283(3), these terms do not include nonrecurring charges for costs incurred due to late payment, damages, deposits, legal costs, or other fees, including attorneys' fees.(((30)))(33) "Rental agreement" or "lease" means all agreements which establish or modify the terms, conditions, rules, regulations, or any other provisions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit.(((31)))(34) "Service member" means an active member of the United States armed forces, a member of a military reserve component, or a member of the national guard who is either stationed in or a resident of Washington state.(((32)))(35) A "single-family residence" is a structure maintained and used as a single dwelling unit. Notwithstanding that a dwelling unit shares one or more walls with another dwelling unit, it shall be deemed a single-family residence if it has direct access to a street and shares neither heating facilities nor hot water equipment, nor any other essential facility or service, with any other dwelling unit.(((33)))(36) "Smart access building" means a building containing a dwelling unit that utilizes a smart access system.(37) "Smart access system" means any system that uses electronic or computerized technology, such as a radio frequency identification card, a mobile phone application, biometric identifier information, or any other digital technology that is designed to gather information in order to grant entry to a building containing a dwelling unit, its elevators, its common areas, or to an individual dwelling unit. A smart access system does not include methods of entry that solely rely upon a keypad or similar device that utilizes the manual entering of a coded sequence of numbers, letters, or both.(38) "Subsidized housing" refers to rental housing for very low-income or low-income households that is a dwelling unit operated directly by a public housing authority or its affiliate, or that is insured, financed, or assisted in whole or in part through one of the following sources:(a) A federal program or state housing program administered by the department of commerce or the Washington state housing finance commission;(b) A federal housing program administered by a city or county government;(c) An affordable housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105; or(d) The surcharges authorized in RCW 36.22.250 and any of the surcharges authorized in chapter 43.185C RCW.(((34)))(39) A "tenant" is any person who is entitled to occupy a dwelling unit primarily for living or dwelling purposes under a rental agreement.(((35)))(40) "Tenant representative" means:(a) A personal representative of a deceased tenant's estate if known to the landlord;(b) If the landlord has no knowledge that a personal representative has been appointed for the deceased tenant's estate, a person claiming to be a successor of the deceased tenant who has provided the landlord with proof of death and an affidavit made by the person that meets the requirements of RCW 11.62.010(2);(c) In the absence of a personal representative under (a) of this subsection or a person claiming to be a successor under (b) of this subsection, a designated person; or(d) In the absence of a personal representative under (a) of this subsection, a person claiming to be a successor under (b) of this subsection, or a designated person under (c) of this subsection, any person who provides the landlord with reasonable evidence that he or she is a successor of the deceased tenant as defined in RCW 11.62.005. The landlord has no obligation to identify all of the deceased tenant's successors.(((36)))(41) "Tenant screening" means using a consumer report or other information about a prospective tenant in deciding whether to make or accept an offer for residential rental property to or from a prospective tenant.(((37)))(42) "Tenant screening report" means a consumer report as defined in RCW 19.182.010 and any other information collected by a tenant screening service.(((38)))(43) "Transitional housing" means housing units owned, operated, or managed by a nonprofit organization or governmental entity in which supportive services are provided to individuals and families that were formerly homeless, with the intent to stabilize them and move them to permanent housing within a period of not more than 24 months, or longer if the program is limited to tenants within a specified age range or the program is intended for tenants in need of time to complete and transition from educational or training or service programs.(((39)))(44) "User" means a tenant of a smart access building.(45) "Wear resulting from ordinary use of the premises" means deterioration that results from the intended use of a dwelling unit, including breakage or malfunction due to age or deteriorated condition. Such wear does not include deterioration that results from negligence, carelessness, accident, or abuse of the premises, fixtures, equipment, appliances, or furnishings by the tenant, immediate family member, occupant, or guest.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:If requested by a tenant, a landlord must offer the tenant an alternative key that does not use biometric identifier information or a software application operated on a tenant's mobile phone or other similar electronic device. Examples of alternative keys include, but are not limited to:(1) A key fob;(2) A key card;(3) A physical key;(4) A method of entry that solely relies upon a keypad or similar device that utilizes the manual entering of a coded sequence of numbers, letters, or both; or(5) Other form of physical access.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:(1) The landlord of a smart access building shall make available to tenants any written privacy policy of the entity that developed the smart access system utilized in such building, or any written privacy policy of the entity that currently operates the smart access system utilized in the building.(2) The landlord of a smart access building, or an agent thereof, must provide to tenants, either upon the initial signing of a lease agreement or within five days of the installation of the smart access system, a written policy in plain language that describes, at a minimum, the following information if it is not included in the privacy policy described in subsection (1) of this section:(a) The data elements to be collected by the smart access system, including the extent to which data elements are collected that contain information of, or relating to, the guests of a tenant;(b) The protocols and safeguards the landlord will provide for protecting such data elements;(c) The retention schedule of such data;(d) The protocols the landlord will follow to address any suspected or actual unauthorized access to or disclosure of such data elements, including notification of users;(e) Guidelines for permanently destroying or anonymizing such data or removing such data from the smart access system; and(f) The process used to add a tenant who has provided written consent on a temporary basis to the smart access system.(3) If the information required to be provided under subsection (2) of this section is provided by the smart access system developer and the landlord does not retain or sell any information from the smart access system, a landlord is compliant with the requirements of this section by providing the privacy policy of the developer or by providing a link to the developer's website which contains the privacy policy of the smart access system.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 59.18 RCW to read as follows:(1) A landlord of a smart access building or third party may collect only the minimum amount of authentication data and reference data necessary to enable the use of a smart access system for the purpose of granting a user access to a building, its elevators, its common areas, or to a user's dwelling.(2) A smart access system may only collect, generate, or utilize the following information:(a) A user's name;(b) The dwelling unit number and other doors or common areas to which the user has access using a smart access system in a building;(c) A user's preferred method of contact;(d) A user's biometric identifier information if a smart access system utilizes biometric identifier information;(e) The identification card number or any identifier associated with the physical hardware used to facilitate building entry, including radio frequency identification card, bluetooth, or other similar technical protocols;(f) Passwords, passcodes, user names, and contact information used singly or in conjunction with other reference data to grant a user entry to a smart access building, dwelling unit of a building, or common area of a building through the building's smart access system, or to access any online tools used to manage user accounts related to a building;(g) Lease information, including move-in and, if available, move-out dates; and(h) The time and method of access, solely for security and operational purposes.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act takes effect January 1, 2027.--- END ---